Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.210

Pledge for payment of principal and interest on revenue or general obligation bonds.

The board of county commissioners of any county in adopting and establishing a system of sewerage and/or water may set aside into a special fund and pledge to the payment of the principal and interest due on any county revenue bonds or general obligation bonds any sums or amounts which may accrue from the collection of rates and charges for the private and public use of the system or systems.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 188 s 4; 1967 c 72 s 21.]